tests/morphophonology/surface_epenthesis.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen:  ../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] basic epenthesis stuff !WORKS! (the spelling of forms below is basically incorrect, but they are frequent enough to add /ур{е}н/ with LR restriction)": 

    урын<n><px1sg><nom> : урным
    урын<n><px1sg><gen> : урнымның
    урын<n><px1sg><dat> : урныма
    урын<n><px1sg><acc> : урнымны
    урын<n><px1sg><abl> : урнымнан
    урын<n><px1sg><loc> : урнымда
    урын<n><px1sg><px><nom> : урнымныкы

    урын<n><px2sg><nom> : урның
    урын<n><px2sg><gen> : урныңның
    урын<n><px2sg><dat> : урныңа
    урын<n><px2sg><acc> : урныңны
    урын<n><px2sg><abl> : урныңнан
    урын<n><px2sg><loc> : урныңда
    урын<n><px2sg><px><nom> : урныңныкы

    урын<n><px3sp><nom> : урны
    урын<n><px3sp><gen> : урнының
    урын<n><px3sp><dat> : урнына
    урын<n><px3sp><acc> : урнын
    урын<n><px3sp><abl> : урныннан
    урын<n><px3sp><loc> : урнында
    урын<n><px3sp><px><nom> : урныныкы

    урын<n><px1pl><nom> : урныбыз
    урын<n><px1pl><gen> : урныбызның
    урын<n><px1pl><dat> : урныбызга
    урын<n><px1pl><acc> : урныбызны
    урын<n><px1pl><abl> : урныбыздан
    урын<n><px1pl><loc> : урныбызда
    урын<n><px1pl><px><nom> : урныбызныкы

    урын<n><px2pl><nom> : урныгыз
    урын<n><px2pl><gen> : урныгызның
    урын<n><px2pl><dat> : урныгызга
    урын<n><px2pl><acc> : урныгызны
    урын<n><px2pl><abl> : урныгыздан
    урын<n><px2pl><loc> : урныгызда
    урын<n><px2pl><px><nom> : урныгызныкы

  "[twol] special epenthesis stuff !WORKS! (not all of the below were founded in the corpus, but some occure more than 100 times. So /сеңел/ is added with LR mark) ":
    сеңел<n><px1sg><nom> : сеңелем
    сеңел<n><px1sg><gen> : сеңелемнең
    сеңел<n><px1sg><dat> : сеңелемә
    сеңел<n><px1sg><acc> : сеңелемне
    сеңел<n><px1sg><abl> : сеңелемнән
    сеңел<n><px1sg><loc> : сеңелемдә
    сеңел<n><px1sg><px><nom> : сеңелемнеке

    сеңел<n><px2sg><nom> : сеңелең
    сеңел<n><px2sg><gen> : сеңелеңнең
    сеңел<n><px2sg><dat> : сеңелеңә
    сеңел<n><px2sg><acc> : сеңелеңне
    сеңел<n><px2sg><abl> : сеңелеңнән
    сеңел<n><px2sg><loc> : сеңелеңдә
    сеңел<n><px2sg><px><nom> : сеңелеңнеке

    сеңел<n><px3sp><nom> : сеңеле
    сеңел<n><px3sp><gen> : сеңеленең
    сеңел<n><px3sp><dat> : сеңеленә
    сеңел<n><px3sp><acc> : сеңелен
    сеңел<n><px3sp><abl> : сеңеленнән
    сеңел<n><px3sp><loc> : сеңелендә
    сеңел<n><px3sp><px><nom> : сеңеленеке

    сеңел<n><px1pl><nom> : сеңелебез
    сеңел<n><px1pl><gen> : сеңелебезнең
    сеңел<n><px1pl><dat> : сеңелебезгә
    сеңел<n><px1pl><acc> : сеңелебезне
    сеңел<n><px1pl><abl> : сеңелебездән
    сеңел<n><px1pl><loc> : сеңелебездә
    сеңел<n><px1pl><px><nom> : сеңелебезнеке

    сеңел<n><px2pl><nom> : сеңелегез
    сеңел<n><px2pl><gen> : сеңелегезнең
    сеңел<n><px2pl><dat> : сеңелегезгә
    сеңел<n><px2pl><acc> : сеңелегезне
    сеңел<n><px2pl><abl> : сеңелегездән
    сеңел<n><px2pl><loc> : сеңелегездә
    сеңел<n><px2pl><px><nom> : сеңелегезнеке
